Illinois, session 104th, SB2532.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Department of Natural Resources:9GENERAL OFFICE10Payable from the General Revenue Fund:11  For ordinary and contingent expenses, including12   payment of revolving fund bills..................6,350,00013  For expenses of the General Office...............12,460,00014  For grants and expenses associated with the15   Youth and Young Adult Conservation and 16    Education Pilot Program.........................2,500,00017Payable from the State Boating Act Fund:18  For Contractual Services ............................53,00019Payable from the State Parks Fund:20  For Contractual Services ............................53,00021Payable from the Wildlife and Fish Fund:22  For Personal Services ..............................159,00023  For State Contributions to State   SB2532- 2 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1   Employees' Retirement System .......................74,0002  For State Contributions to 3   Social Security ....................................11,5004  For Group Insurance .................................66,4005  For Contractual Services ...........................618,8006  For Travel ...........................................5,0007  For Equipment ........................................1,1008Payable from the Underground Resources 9 Conservation Enforcement Fund:10  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses................270,00011Payable from the Natural Areas Acquisition Fund:12  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses.................35,00013Payable from Park and Conservation Fund: 14  For Contractual Services............................405,00015  For expenses of the Park and16   Conservation Program.............................2,200,00017Payable from the Abandoned Mined Lands Reclamation Council 18Federal Trust Fund:19  For ordinary and contingent expenses for 20   the support of the Abandoned Mined Lands 21   program............................................511,70022    Total                                         $25,773,500 23    Section 10. The sum of $2,412,200, or so much therefore as 24may be necessary, is appropriated from the DNR Special 25Projects Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for   SB2532- 3 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1expenses of grant, inter-agency agreement or donation-funded 2special projects for various costs including, but not limited 3to, education, habitat protection and preservation, 4maintenance and, improvements on department lands and 5facilities. 6    Section 15. The sum of $50,000, or therefore as may be 7necessary, is appropriated from the DNR Special Projects Fund 8to the Department of Natural Resources for all ordinary and 9contingent expenses related, but not limited to, the H.O.P.E. 10Program. 11    Section 20. The sum of $1,000,000, or therefore as may be 12necessary, is appropriated from the DNR Special Projects Fund 13to the Department of Natural Resources for all ordinary and 14contingent expenses related, but not limited to, the 15department's research, protection, and education initiatives. 16    Section 25. The following named sums, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 18purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 19ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 20Resources: 21OFFICE OF REALTY AND CAPITAL PLANNING22Payable from the General Revenue Fund:  SB2532- 4 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For expenses of the Office of Realty2   and Capital Planning.............................4,775,0003Payable from the State Boating Act Fund:4  For expenses of the Heavy Equipment5   Dredging Crew......................................833,7006  For expenses of the Office of Realty and 7   Capital Planning...................................275,0008Payable from the State Parks Fund:9  For Commodities ......................................6,50010  For Equipment........................................20,00011  For expenses of the Office of Realty and 12   Capital Planning...................................150,00013Payable from the Wildlife and Fish Fund:14  For Equipment........................................10,00015  For expenses of the Heavy Equipment16   Dredging Crew......................................215,00017  For expenses of the Office of Realty and 18   Capital Planning...................................215,00019Payable from the Natural Areas Acquisition Fund:20  For expenses of Natural Areas Execution.............207,80021Payable from Open Space Lands Acquisition 22 and Development Fund: 23  For expenses of the OSLAD Program: ...............1,447,80024Payable from the Partners for 25 Conservation Fund:26  For expenses of the Partners for Conservation  SB2532- 5 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1   Program..........................................1,100,0002Payable from the Historic Property Administrative Fund3  For administrative purposes associated4   with the Historic Tax Credit Program...............630,0005Payable from the DNR Federal Projects Fund:6  For federal projects,7   including but not limited to8   FEMA natural disaster projects and9   federally declared disaster response10   and repair.........................................200,00011Payable from the Illinois Wildlife  12 Preservation Fund:13  For operation of Consultation Program.............1,073,100 14  For expenses related to implementation of EcoCAT....600,00015Payable from Park and Conservation Fund:16  For the Office of Realty and17   Capital Planning.................................5,306,00018  For expenses of the Bikeways Program ...............556,30019    Total                                         $17,671,200 20    Section 30. The sum of $1,189,200, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Historic 22Sites Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the 23costs associated with the preservation services program, 24including operational expenses, maintenance, repairs, 25permanent improvements, and special events.   SB2532- 6 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Section 35. The sum of $150,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Historic Sites 3Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for awards and 4grants associated with the preservation services program. 5    Section 40. The sum of $640,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the Park and Conservation 7Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the costs 8associated with the preservation services program, including 9operational expenses, maintenance, repairs, permanent 10improvements, and special events. 11    Section 45. The sum of $582,800, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary, is appropriated from the Tourism Promotion Fund 13to the Department of Natural Resources for the costs 14associated with the preservation services program, including 15operational expenses, maintenance, repairs, permanent 16improvements, and special events. 17    Section 50. The following named sums, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 19purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 20ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 21Resources:22OFFICE OF STRATEGIC SERVICES  SB2532- 7 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Payable from the General Revenue Fund:2  For expenses of the Office of 3   Strategic Services...............................1,111,0004Payable from State Boating Act Fund:5  For Contractual Services ...........................147,0006  For Contractual Services for Postage7   Expenses for DNR Headquarters......................290,7008  For Commodities.....................................115,0009  For Printing........................................125,00010  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................6,00011  For expenses associated with12    Watercraft Titling..............................2,011,40013  For Refunds..........................................10,00014Payable from the State Parks Fund:15  For the implementation of the16   Camping/Lodging Reservation System...............1,000,00017  For Public Events and Promotions.....................15,00018  For operation and maintenance of 19   new sites and facilities, including Sparta..........25,00020Payable from the Wildlife and Fish Fund:21  For Personal Services.............................1,621,10022  For State Contributions to State 23   Employees' Retirement System ......................753,60024  For State Contributions to 25   Social Security....................................124,10026  For Group Insurance ................................600,700  SB2532- 8 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For Contractual Services ...........................750,0002  For Contractual Services for3   Postage Expenses for DNR Headquarters...............35,7004  For Travel...........................................20,0005  For Commodities.....................................150,0006  For Printing........................................220,0007  For Equipment........................................61,4008  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................30,0009  For expenses incurred for the 10   implementation, education and11   maintenance of the12   Point of Sale System,13   including prior years' costs.....................6,000,00014  For Educational Publications Services and15   Expenses ...........................................20,40016  For expenses associated with the State Fair..........85,00017  For Refunds.........................................450,00018Payable from Park and Conservation Fund:19  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses..............3,037,00020  For expenses associated with the State Fair.........150,00021    Total                                         $18,965,100 22    Section 55. The following named sums, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 24purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 25ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural   SB2532- 9 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Resources:2SPARTA WORLD SHOOTING AND RECREATION COMPLEX3Payable from the State Parks Fund:4  For the ordinary and contingent5   expenses of the World Shooting and6   Recreational Complex.............................1,650,0007  For the ordinary and contingent8   expenses of the World Shooting9   and Recreational Complex, of which10   no expenditures shall be authorized11   from the appropriation until revenues12   from sponsorships or donations sufficient13   to offset such expenditures have been14   collected and deposited into the15   State Parks Fund...................................100,00016  For the Sparta Imprest Account.......................75,00017Payable from the Wildlife and Fish Fund:18  For the ordinary and contingent19   expenses of the World Shooting and20   Recreational Complex.............................1,650,00021    Total                                          $3,475,000 22    Section 60. The following named sums, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 24purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 25ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural   SB2532- 10 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Resources:2OFFICE OF GRANT MANAGEMENT AND ASSISTANCE3Payable from the General Revenue Fund:4  For expenses of the Office of Grant5   Management and Assistance........................1,930,0006Payable from the State Boating Act Fund:7  For expenses of the Office of Grant 8   Management and Assistance .........................140,0009Payable from Wildlife and Fish Fund:10  For expenses of the Office of Grant 11   Management and Assistance .........................830,70012Payable from Open Space Lands Acquisition 13 and Development Fund: 14  For expenses of the Office of Grant 15   Management and Assistance .........................428,70016Payable from DNR Federal Projects Fund: 17  For expenses of the Office of Grant 18   Management and Assistance ..........................80,00019    Total                                          $3,409,400 20    Section 65. The sum of $154,600, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 22the Department Natural Resources for a grant to the Illinois 23Lyme Association for ordinary and contingent expenses 24associated with Tick Research, Education, and Evaluation.   SB2532- 11 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Section 70. The following named sums, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 3purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 4ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 5Resources:6OFFICE OF RESOURCE CONSERVATION7Payable from Wildlife and Fish Fund:8  For Personal Services ...........................13,126,7009  For State Contributions to State 10   Employees' Retirement System.....................6,102,10011  For State Contributions to 12   Social Security..................................1,044,20013  For Group Insurance...............................3,938,10014  For Contractual Services..........................2,300,00015  For Travel...........................................75,00016  For Commodities...................................1,023,00017  For Printing........................................150,00018  For Equipment.......................................200,00019  For Telecommunication Services......................230,00020  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................365,00021  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses22   of The Chronic Wasting Disease Program23   and other wildlife containment programs,24   the surveillance and control of feral25   livestock populations, and managing large26   carnivore occurrences............................1,800,000  SB2532- 12 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For an Urban Fishing Program in2   conjunction with the Chicago Park3   District to provide fishing and resource4   management at the park district lagoons............342,8005  For workshops, training and other6   activities to improve the administration7   of fish and wildlife federal aid8   programs from federal aid administrative9   grants received for such purposes...................10,00010  For fishery conservation and restoration 11   authorized by the Dingell-Johnson 12   Sport Fish Restoration Act......................7,596,200 13  For wildlife restoration authorized14   by the Pittman-Robertson Wildlife 15   Restoration Act................................18,394,100 16Payable from Salmon Fund:17  For Personal Services ..............................159,80018  For State Contributions to State 19   Employees' Retirement System .......................74,30020  For State Contributions to21   Social Security ....................................12,30022  For Group Insurance .................................55,60023Payable from the Healthy Forest, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant 24Fund: 25  For the Healthy Forest, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant 26Program...............................................500,000  SB2532- 13 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Payable from the Illinois Fisheries Management Fund:2  For operational expenses related to the3   Division of Fisheries............................1,400,0004Payable from Natural Areas Acquisition Fund:5  For Personal Services.............................3,104,4006  For State Contributions to State 7   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,443,2008  For State Contributions to 9   Social Security....................................237,50010  For Group Insurance ................................943,60011  For Contractual Services............................190,70012  For Travel...........................................25,00013  For Commodities......................................43,80014  For Equipment........................................86,30015  For Telecommunication Services.......................38,10016  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................75,00017  For expenses of the Natural Areas18   Stewardship Program..............................3,708,20019  For Expenses Related to the Endangered20   Species Protection Board.................................021  For Administration of the Illinois22   Natural Areas Preservation Act...................3,441,20023Payable from Partners for Conservation Fund:24  For ordinary and contingent expenses25   of operating the Partners for26   Conservation Program.............................2,475,500  SB2532- 14 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Payable from the Natural Resources  2 Restoration Trust Fund:3  For Natural Resources Trustee Program.............2,900,0004Payable from the DNR Federal Projects Fund:5  For expenses of federal projects,6   including but not limited to those7   related to federally funded wildlife8   and natural areas management, emergencies,9   or recreational grant lease programs.............1,607,00010Payable from Illinois Forestry Development Fund:11  For ordinary and contingent expenses12   of the Urban Forestry Program....................4,461,40013  For payment of timber buyers' bond forfeitures......141,80014  For payment of the expenses of15   the Illinois Forestry Development Council..........118,50016Payable from the State Migratory 17 Waterfowl Stamp Fund:18  For Stamp Fund Operations...........................125,00019Payable from the DNR Federal Projects Fund:20  For expenses of federal projects, including21   but not limited to the continued staffing,22   development, and support of aquatic23   nuisance species management plans,24   fulfilling those management plans and25   agreements, monitoring and removal of26   aquatic nuisance species (ANS), including  SB2532- 15 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1   the detection, management and control, and2   response actions necessary for Asian carp3   and other ANS and related subgrantee4   payments for such purposes, including5   prior years' costs..............................43,500,0006    Total                                        $127,565,400 7    Section 75. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the Wildlife and Fish Fund 9to the Department of Natural Resources for the non-federal 10cost share of a Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program to 11establish long-term contracts and permanent conservation 12easements in the Illinois River Basin; to fund cost share 13assistance to landowners to encourage approved conservation 14practices in environmentally sensitive and highly erodible 15areas of the Illinois River Basin; and to fund the monitoring 16of long-term improvements of these conservation practices as 17required in the Memorandum of Agreement between the State of 18Illinois and the United States Department of Agriculture. 19    Section 80. The sum of $650,000, or so much thereof may be 20necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Natural 21Resources from the Partners for Conservation Fund for expenses 22associated with Partners for Conservation Program to Implement 23Ecosystem-Based Management for Illinois' Natural Resources.   SB2532- 16 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Section 85. The sum of $25,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Roadside Monarch 3Habitat Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for 4ordinary and contingent expenses related to the development, 5enhancement and restoration of Monarch butterfly and other 6pollinator habitats. 7    Section 90. The sum of $4,500,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Wildlife and Fish 9Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for expenses of 10subgrantee payments. 11    Section 95. The sum of $8,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, independently or in cooperation with the 13Federal Government or any agency thereof, any municipal 14corporation, or political subdivision of the State, or with 15any public or private corporation, organization, or 16individual, is appropriated to the Department of Natural 17Resources from the Federal Title IV Fire Protection Assistance 18Fund for refunds and for Rural Community Fire Protection 19Programs. 20    Section 100. The sum of $275,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Wildlife and Fish Fund 22to the Department of Natural Resources for ordinary and 23contingent expenses of Resource Conservation.   SB2532- 17 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Section 105. The sum of $1,372,900, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Wildlife and Fish 3Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for expenses of 4the Wildlife and Habitat Conservation. 5    Section 110. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, independently or in cooperation with the 7Federal Government or any agency thereof, any municipal 8corporation, or political subdivision of the State, or with 9any public or private corporation, organization, or 10individual, is appropriated to the Department of Natural 11Resources from the Illinois Forestry Development Fund for all 12expenses related to development, enhancement, and restoration 13of forest ecosystems through the U.S. Department of 14Agricultures the Landscape Scale Restoration Forest Landowner 15Support Grant Program. 16OFFICE OF COASTAL MANAGEMENT 17    Section 115. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof may 18be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Natural 19Resources from the DNR Federal Projects Fund for expenses 20related to the Coastal Management Program. 21    Section 120. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Natural   SB2532- 18 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Resources from the DNR Federal Projects Fund for expenses 2related to the Great Lakes Initiative. 3    Section 125. The following named sums, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 5purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 6ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 7Resources:8OFFICE OF LAW ENFORCEMENT9Payable from the General Revenue Fund:10For expenses of the Office of Law11  Enforcement......................................18,000,00012Payable from State Boating Act Fund:13  For Personal Services.............................1,523,90014  For State Contributions to State 15   Employees' Retirement System.......................708,40016  For State Contributions to 17   Social Security.....................................75,00018  For Group Insurance.................................457,20019  For Contractual Services............................717,30020  For Travel...........................................96,50021  For Commodities.....................................307,40022  For Equipment.....................................1,347,50023  For Expenses of DUI/OUI Equipment....................20,00024  For Telecommunication Services......................615,00025  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................590,000  SB2532- 19 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For Operational Expenses of the Snowmobile 2   Program.............................................35,0003Payable from State Parks Fund:4  For Personal Services.............................1,280,0005  For State Contributions to State 6   Employees' Retirement System.......................595,1007  For State Contributions to 8   Social Security.....................................80,0009  For Group Insurance.................................384,80010  For Equipment.......................................934,00011Payable from Wildlife and Fish Fund:12  For Personal Services.............................8,041,70013  For State Contributions to State 14   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,738,70015  For State Contributions to 16   Social Security....................................516,20017  For Group Insurance...............................1,811,40018  For Contractual Services..........................1,045,80019  For Travel...........................................91,50020  For Commodities.....................................231,00021  For Printing.........................................57,00022  For Equipment.....................................1,573,20023  For Telecommunication Services......................790,70024  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................370,00025Payable from Conservation Police Operations 26 Assistance Fund:  SB2532- 20 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For expenses associated with the2   Conservation Police Officers.....................3,283,5003Payable from the Drug Traffic 4 Prevention Fund:5  For use in enforcing laws regulating6   controlled substances and cannabis7   on Department of Natural Resources8   regulated lands and waterways to the9   extent funds are received by the10   Department......................................... 25,00011    Total                                         $49,342,400 12    Section 130. The sum of $20,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from the State Boating Act Fund 14to the Department of Natural Resources for expenses of Alcohol 15Enforcement. 16    Section 135. The following named sums, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 18purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 19ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 20Resources:21OFFICE OF LAND MANAGEMENT AND EDUCATION22Payable from the General Revenue Fund:23  For expenses of the Office of Land 24   Management and Education .......................27,300,000  SB2532- 21 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For ordinary and contingent expenses of 2   State Parks and Historic Sites...................4,885,0003Payable from State Boating Act Fund:4  For Personal Services.............................1,491,6005  For State Contributions to State 6   Employees' Retirement System.......................693,4007  For State Contributions to 8   Social Security....................................114,2009  For Group Insurance.................................566,90010  For Contractual Services............................714,00011  For Commodities.....................................175,00012  For Snowmobile Programs..............................57,00013Payable from State Parks Fund:14  For Personal Services.............................1,357,30015  For State Contributions to State 16   Employees' Retirement System.......................631,00017  For State Contributions to 18   Social Security....................................103,90019  For Group Insurance.................................630,40020  For Contractual Services..........................3,121,20021  For Travel...........................................38,00022  For Commodities.....................................610,00023  For Equipment.......................................300,00024  For Telecommunication Services......................345,00025  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................530,00026  For expenses related to the  SB2532- 22 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1   Illinois-Michigan Canal............................120,0002  For operations and maintenance from3   revenues derived from the sale of4   surplus crops and timber harvest.................2,010,0005  For Refunds..........................................30,0006Payable from the Wildlife and Fish Fund:7  For Personal Services.............................3,422,2008  For State Contributions to State 9   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,590,90010  For State Contributions to 11   Social Security....................................261,80012  For Group Insurance...............................1,658,90013  For Contractual Services..........................1,866,60014  For Travel............................................6,00015  For Commodities.....................................625,00016  For Equipment.......................................400,00017  For Telecommunication Services.......................35,00018  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................265,00019  For Union County and Horseshoe20   Lake Conservation Areas,21   Farming and Wildlife operations....................615,00022  For operations and maintenance from23   revenues derived from the sale of24   surplus crops and timber harvest.................2,205,00025Payable from Wildlife Prairie Park Fund:26  Grant to Wildlife Prairie Park for the  SB2532- 23 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1   Park's Operations and Improvements..................25,0002Payable from Illinois and Michigan Canal Fund:3  For expenses related to the 4   Illinois-Michigan Canal.............................15,0005Payable from Park and Conservation Fund:6  For expenses of the Park and Conservation7   Program.........................................20,462,7608  For expenses of the Bikeways program..............1,719,4009  For the expenses related to FEMA10   Grants to the extent that such funds11   are available to the Department....................500,00012  For expenses of the Park and Conservation13   Program..........................................9,500,00014Payable from the Adeline Jay Geo-Karis  15 Illinois Beach Marina Fund:16  For operating expenses of the17   North Point Marina at Winthrop Harbor...............25,00018  For Refunds...........................................5,00019    Total                                         $91,027,460 20    Section 140. The sum of $2,247,500, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Wildlife and Fish 22Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for expenses of 23Wildlife and Habitat Conservation at State Parks and Historic 24Sites.   SB2532- 24 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Section 145. The following named sums, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 3purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 4ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 5Resources:6OFFICE OF HISTORIC SITES7Payable from the General Revenue Fund:8  For expenses of the Office of Historic 9   Sites .............................................730,00010Payable from the State Parks Fund:11  For expenses of the Office of Historic 12   Sites ...........................................2,000,00013Payable from the Illinois Historic Sites Fund:14  For expenses of the Office of Historic15   Sites including prior year costs ................3,500,00016Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund:17  For expenses of the Office of Historic 18   Sites ...........................................8,750,00019Payable from the Park and Conservation Fund:20  For expenses of the Office of Historic 21   Sites ...........................................3,366,00022  Total                                           $18,346,000 23    Section 150. The following named sums, or so much thereof 24as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 25purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the   SB2532- 25 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 2Resources:3OFFICE OF MINES AND MINERALS4Payable from the General Revenue Fund:5  For expenses of the Office of 6   Mines and Minerals...............................1,885,0007Payable from the Explosives Regulatory Fund:8  For expenses associated with Explosive9   Regulation.........................................293,80010Payable from the Aggregate Operations 11 Regulatory Fund:12  For expenses associated with Aggregate13   Mining Regulation..................................366,30014Payable from the Coal Mining Regulatory Fund:15  For the purpose of coordinating16   training and education programs17   for miners and laboratory analysis18   and testing of coal samples and mine19   atmospheres........................................117,30020  For expenses associated with Surface 21   Coal Mining Regulation.............................271,40022  For operation of the Mining Safety Program...........30,60023Payable from the Federal Surface Mining Control 24 and Reclamation Fund:25  For Personal Services.............................2,288,80026  For State Contributions to State   SB2532- 26 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,064,0002  For State Contributions to 3   Social Security ...................................175,1004  For Group Insurance ................................796,3005  For Contractual Services ...........................500,0006  For expenses associated with litigation7   of Mining Regulatory actions.............................08  For Travel...........................................25,0009  For Commodities.......................................5,00010  For Printing..........................................1,00011  For Equipment.......................................305,00012  For Electronic Data Processing.......................50,00013  For Telecommunication Services.......................40,00014  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................45,00015  For the purpose of coordinating16   training and education programs for17   miners and laboratory analysis and18   testing of coal samples and mine19   atmospheres........................................360,80020  For Small Operators' Assistance Program...................021Payable from the Land Reclamation Fund:22  For the purpose of reclaiming surface23   mined lands, with respect to which24   a bond has been forfeited........................1,500,00025Payable from Coal Technology Development Assistance Fund:26  For expenses of Coal Mining Regulation............4,317,300  SB2532- 27 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For expenses of Coal Mining Safety................4,093,0002Payable from the Abandoned Mined Lands 3 Reclamation Council Federal Trust Fund:4  For Personal Services ............................5,303,5005  For State Contributions to State 6   Employees' Retirement System ....................2,465,4007  For State Contributions to 8   Social Security ...................................405,8009  For Group Insurance ..............................1,200,00010  For Contractual Services .........................1,000,00011  For Travel..........................................100,00012  For Commodities......................................45,00013  For Printing..........................................1,00014  For Equipment.......................................520,00015  For Electronic Data Processing......................150,00016  For Telecommunication Services.......................45,00017  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................150,00018  For operational expenses related to the19   Hard Rock Grant Program............................132,300 20  For expenses of Hard Rock Projects..................117,80021  For expenses associated with22   Environmental Mitigation Projects,23   Studies, Research, and Administrative24   Support..........................................2,000,00025    Total                                         $32,166,500   SB2532- 28 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Section 155. The sum of $1,160,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Surface 3Mining Control and Reclamation Fund to the Department of 4Natural Resources for ordinary and contingent expenses for the 5support of the Land Reclamation program. 6    Section 160. The following named sums, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 8purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 9ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 10Resources:11OFFICE OF OIL AND GAS RESOURCE MANAGEMENT12Payable from the General Revenue Fund:13  For expenses of the Office of Oil and14   Gas Resource Management..........................2,375,00015Payable from the Mines and Minerals Underground 16 Injection Control Fund: 17  For Expenses of Oil and Gas Regulation............1,235,00018Payable from Plugging and Restoration Fund:19  For Personal Services.............................1,500,00020  For State Contributions to State 21   Employees' Retirement System ......................697,30022  For State Contributions to 23   Social Security.....................................86,40024  For Group Insurance.................................529,50025  For Contractual Services ............................32,100  SB2532- 29 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For Travel............................................2,0002  For Commodities.......................................2,5003  For Equipment.......................................318,0004  For Electronic Data Processing........................6,0005  For Telecommunication Services.......................10,2006  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................235,0007  For Plugging & Restoration Projects,8   including prior years' costs.....................2,000,0009  For Refunds..........................................20,00010  For expenses associated with the Methane11   Emissions Reduction Program authorized by12     Section 60113 of the Inflation Reduction13   Act (IRA) of 2022................................4,200,000 14 For expenses associated with the Orphaned Well15   Plugging Program authorized by16     Section 40601 of the Infrastructure 17   Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA) of 2021...........2,000,00018Payable from the Oil and Gas Resource 19 Management Fund:20  For expenses associated with the operations21   Of the Office of Oil and Gas.......................500,00022Payable from Underground Resources 23 Conservation Enforcement Fund: 24  For Personal Services...............................920,00025  For State Contributions to State 26   Employees' Retirement System ......................427,700  SB2532- 30 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For State Contributions to 2   Social Security.....................................75,5003  For Group Insurance.................................295,8004  For Contractual Services............................252,0005  For Travel...........................................15,0006  For Commodities......................................10,0007  For Printing..........................................1,0008  For Equipment.......................................107,5009  For Electronic Data Processing......................475,00010  For Telecommunication Services.......................35,00011  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................85,00012  For Interest Penalty Escrow...............................013  For Refunds.........................................375,00014    Total                                         $18,823,500 15    Section 165. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Oil and Gas 17Resource Management Fund to the Department of Natural 18Resources for all costs associated with the Safety and Aid for 19the Environment in Carbon Capture and Sequestration Act (SAFE 20CCS Act). 21    Section 170. The following named sums, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 23named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and contingent 24expenses of the Department of Natural Resources:  SB2532- 31 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1OFFICE OF WATER RESOURCES2Payable form the General Revenue Fund:3  For equipment: .....................................640,0004  For Community Water Infrastructure Planning.......1,235,0005  For non-federal cost sharing6   participation with the U.S. Army Corps 7   of Engineers, including costs associated8   with operating, water supply, and maintenance9   contracts or agreements, including10   prior years' costs...............................1,800,00011  For expenses related to Water Development12   Planning and Flood Surveillance programs,13   including prior years' costs.....................1,400,00014  For expenses of the Office of 15   Water Resources..................................5,000,00016Payable from the State Boating Act Fund:17For expenses of the Office of 18   Water Resources..................................1,652,00019  For Personal Services...............................362,90020  For State Contributions to State 21   Employees' Retirement System.......................168,70022  For State Contributions to 23   Social Security.....................................26,20024  For Group Insurance.................................125,20025  For expenses of the Boat Grant Match................130,00026  For Repairs and Modifications to Facilities..........53,900  SB2532- 32 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Payable from the Wildlife and Fish Fund:2  For payment of the Department's3   share of operation and maintenance4   of statewide stream gauging network,5   water data storage and retrieval6   system, in cooperation with the U.S.7   Geological Survey..................................600,0008Payable from the Capital Development Fund:9  For Personal Services.............................1,871,20010  For State Contributions to State11    Employees' Retirement System......................869,90012  For State Contributions to Social Security..........143,20013  For Group Insurance.................................350,00014Payable from the National Flood Insurance 15 Program Fund:16  For execution of state assistance17   programs to improve the administration18   of the National Flood Insurance19   Program (NFIP) and National Dam20   Safety Program as approved by21   the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA)22   (82 Stat. 572)...................................1,000,00023Payable from the DNR Federal Projects Fund:24  For expenses of Water Resources Planning,25   Resource Management Programs and26   Project Implementation.............................100,000  SB2532- 33 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Total                                         $17,528,200 2    Section 175. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Natural 4Resources for expenditure by the Office of Water Resources 5from the Flood Control Land Lease Fund for disbursement of 6monies received pursuant to Act of Congress dated September 3, 71954 (68 Statutes 1266, same as appears in Section 701c-3, 8Title 33, United States Code Annotated), provided such 9disbursement shall be in compliance with 15 ILCS 515/1 10Illinois Compiled Statutes. 11    Section 180. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary, is appropriated from the Water Resources Fund to 13the Department of Natural Resources for all costs associated 14with the Safety and Aid for the Environment in Carbon Capture 15and Sequestration Act (SAFE CCS Act). 16    Section 185. The following named sums, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 18named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and contingent 19expenses of the Department of Natural Resources:20ILLINOIS STATE MUSEUM21Payable form the General Revenue Fund:22  For Contractual Services..........................1,900,00023  For Travel...........................................35,000  SB2532- 34 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1  For Commodities......................................75,0002  For Printing.........................................10,0003  For Equipment.......................................400,0004  For Telecommunication Services......................300,0005  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................7,0006  For expenses of the Illinois 7   State Museum.....................................3,785,0008Payable from the Illinois State Museum Fund: 9  For expenses of the Illinois 10   State Museum........................................25,00011    Total                                          $6,537,000 12    Section 190. The sum of $500,000, or so much of that amount 13as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 14Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for deposit into 15the Healthy Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program 16Fund. 17    Section 195. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary, is appropriated from the Park and Conservation 19Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the cost 20associated with a vulnerability assessment to preserve and 21restore the beaches and parks along the 67th and 79th streets 22in the City of Chicago. 23  Total, this Article..........................$468,289,660   SB2532- 35 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1ARTICLE 22    Section 5. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 4business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 5in Article 53, Section 110 and Article 54, Section 10 of Public 6Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department 7of Natural Resources from the DNR Federal Projects Fund for 8expenses related to the Coastal Management Program. 9    Section 10. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary and as remains unexpended at the close of 11business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 12for such purpose in Article 53, Section 70 and Article 54, 13Section 20 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 14reappropriated from the Wildlife and Fish Fund to the 15Department of Natural Resources for the non-federal cost share 16of a Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program to establish 17long-term contracts and permanent conservation easements in 18the Illinois River Basin; to fund cost share assistance to 19landowners to encourage approved conservation practices in 20environmentally sensitive and highly erodible areas of the 21Illinois River Basin; and to fund the monitoring of long-term 22improvements of these conservation practices as required in 23the Memorandum of Agreement between the State of Illinois and   SB2532- 36 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1the United States Department of Agriculture. 2    Section 15. The sum of $7,475,591, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary and as remains unexpended at the close of 4business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 5in Article 53, Section 5 and Article 54, Section 25 of Public 6Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department 7of Natural Resources from the Park and Conservation Fund for 8expenses of the Park and Conservation Program. 9    Section 20. The sum of $9,500,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary and as remains unexpended at the close of 11business on June 30, 2025, appropriations heretofore made in 12Article 53, Section 130 and Article 54, Section 30 of Public 13Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department 14of Natural Resources from the Park and Conservation Fund for 15expenses of the Park and Conservation Program. 16    Section 25. The sum of $2,458,169, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary and as remains unexpended at the close of 18business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 19in Article 53, Section 80 and Article 54, Section 35 of Public 20Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department 21of Natural Resources from the Partners for Conservation Fund 22for expenses associated with the Partners for Conservation 23Program to Implement Ecosystem-Based Management for Illinois'   SB2532- 37 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Natural Resources. 2    Section 30. The sum of $11,448,842, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 4business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 5in Article 53, Section 65 and Article 54, Section 40 of Public 6Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department 7of Natural Resources from the Illinois Forestry Development 8Fund for ordinary and contingent expenses of the Urban 9Forestry Program. 10    Section 35. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 12business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 13in Article 53, Section 130 and Article 54, Section 45 of Public 14Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department 15of Natural Resources from the State Parks Fund for operations 16and maintenance. 17    Section 40. The sum of $4,500,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 19business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 20in Article 53, Section 130 and Article 54, Section 50 of Public 21Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department 22of Natural Resources from the Wildlife and Fish Fund for 23operations and maintenance.   SB2532- 38 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Section 45. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 3on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made in 4Article 53, Section 65 and Article 54, Section 55 of Public Act 5103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department of 6Natural Resources from the State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp 7Fund for Stamp Fund Operations. 8    Section 50. The sum of $9,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 10business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 11in Article 53, Section 90 and Article 54, Section 60 of Public 12Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Wildlife 13and Fish Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for 14expenses of subgrantee payments. 15    Section 55. The sum of $70,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 17business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 18in Article 53, Section 75 and Article 54, Section 70 of Public 19Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Wildlife 20and Fish Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for (i) 21reallocation of Wildlife and Fish grant reimbursements, (ii) 22wildlife conservation and restoration plans and programs from 23federal and/or state funds provided for such purposes or (iii)   SB2532- 39 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1both purposes. 2    Section 60. The sum of $2,248,714, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 4business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 5in Article 54, Section 75 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 6is reappropriated from the Wildlife and Fish Fund to the 7Department of Natural Resources for expenses of subgrantee 8payments. 9    Section 65. The sum of $663,891, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 11on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made in 12Article 53, Section 35 and Article 54, Section 80 of Public Act 13103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Illinois 14Historic Sites Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for 15awards and grants associated with the preservation services 16program. 17    Section 70. The sum of $16,000,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, independently or in cooperation with the 19Federal Government or any agency thereof, any municipal 20corporation, or political subdivision of the State, or with 21any public or private corporation, organization, or individual 22and remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 232025, from appropriations heretofore made in Article 53,   SB2532- 40 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1Section 95 and Article 54, Section 90 of Public Act 103-0589, 2as amended, is reappropriated to the Department of Natural 3Resources from the Federal Title IV Fire Protection Assistance 4Fund for refunds and for Rural Community Fire Protection 5Programs. 6    Section 75. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 8business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 9in Article 53, Section 115, and Article 54, Section 95 of 10Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the 11Department of Natural Resources from the DNR Federal Projects 12Fund for expenses related to the Great Lakes Initiative. 13    Section 80. The sum of $8,000,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 15business on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made 16in Article 53, Section 165, and Article 54, Section 100 of 17Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the 18Department of Natural Resources from the Land Reclamation Fund 19for the purpose of reclaiming surface mined lands, with 20respect to which a bond has been forfeited. 21    Section 85. The sum of $656,000, or so much therefore may 22be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 23on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made for   SB2532- 41 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1such purposes in Article 54, Section 125 of Public Act 2103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the General 3Revenue Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for 4expenses for two dam safety studies in Rock Island County. 5    Section 90. The sum of $462,733, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 7on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made for 8such purposes in Article 54, Section 115 of Public Act 9103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department of 10Natural Resources from the General Revenue Fund for a grant to 11the City of Wilmington for land rights acquisition and 12expenses associated with the Wilmington Dam and Mill Race Dam, 13and for costs associated with public safety or infrastructure 14improvements. 15    Section 95. The sum of $13,875,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 17business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 18made for such purposes in Article 53, Section 210 of Public Act 19103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the DNR Federal 20Projects Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for 21expenses and grants connected with the Urban and Community 22Forestry Program as authorized by Section 23003 of the 23Inflation Reduction Act (IRA) of 2022.   SB2532- 42 -OMB104 00016 DPL 10016 b1    Section 100. The sum of $1,500,000 or so much thereof as 2may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 3business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 4made for such purposes in Article 53, Section 195 of Public Act 5103-0589, as amended is reappropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for a 7grant to the City of Edwardsville Parks and Recreation 8Department for costs associated with park development. 9  Total, this Article..........................$173,538,940 10    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.